District of Columbia statutes.
9-115.01

Plan for future use of Klingle Road.

No later than December 31, 2002, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council, by resolution, a plan for the future use of Klingle Road, N.W.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3502, 49 DCR 6968

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see §§ 3402 and 3403 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).